Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that household appliances that have long lifespans and are reparable can save consumers money associated with replacement costs and can reduce waste associated with discarding broken appliances. Further, appliances that are built to conserve energy and water can reduce consumers' utility bills and help preserve state resources. The legislature also finds that easy access to credible information regarding the expected lifespan, efficiency, and reparability of household appliances will help consumers in Washington state make more informed purchasing decisions. Further, reliable and accessible information that enables consumers to choose more affordable and sustainable models can generate demand for sustainable products which spurs innovation in the sector, resulting in greater savings and reducing waste overall.Therefore, the legislature intends to assess the feasibility of developing an affordability index for appliances sold into Washington state that would provide consumers with credible and reliable information regarding the expected lifespan, efficiency, and reparability of household appliances to enable Washingtonians to make more informed choices and to drive innovation towards more sustainable appliances.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The department of commerce must carry out a study and submit a summary report to the legislature by January 31, 2028, assessing the feasibility of developing an affordability index for appliances sold into Washington state. The study required under this section must, at a minimum, consider what criteria an appliance would be evaluated under in an affordability index, including, but not limited to:(a) Ease of maintenance and servicing based on physical design and component accessibility;(b) The availability of repair materials including replacement parts, service manuals, and the need for special tools or proprietary software;(c) Estimated performance life with and without recommended routine maintenance;(d) Estimated annual routine maintenance costs;(e) Resistance to wear and tear;(f) Duration of software support and reliance on software support;(g) Use of renewable and recycled materials in appliance construction;(h) End-of-life compostability or recyclability of major components; and(i) Costs to dispose of or recycle the appliance and its associated parts.(2) The study must consider the incorporation of efficiency metrics and tools such as demand-response capability, water consumption, and in-use and standby energy consumption into the affordability index.(3) The study must evaluate the following as it relates to the use of an affordability index:(a) Which appliances would be included in the affordability index. Appliances do not include consumer electronics such as smartphones, computers, tablets, gaming consoles, and wearable devices like smartwatches;(b) Feasibility of adapting existing appliance sustainability labeling standards for use in Washington;(c) How the information in the affordability index will be generated, updated, and verified;(d) Who will be responsible for management of the affordability index as well as estimated one-time and ongoing costs associated with maintenance of an affordability index;(e) How information about the affordability index will be communicated to customers;(f) Recommendations on how consumer feedback regarding appliance affordability and sustainability can be collected and how it may inform an affordability index;(g) Recommendations to support manufacturer participation in the affordability index program including consideration of a rebate program.(4) In carrying out the study, the department of commerce or their designee must solicit input from stakeholders with expertise or lived experience in the following:(a) Right to repair as it relates to appliances;(b) Solid waste management;(c) Consumer sustainability practices;(d) Appliance manufacturing;(e) Energy efficiency;(f) Consumer protection;(g) Appliance standards, including energy star programs;(h) Washington state building code standards; and(i) Low-income and historically disadvantaged populations.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act expires July 1, 2029.--- END ---